Hawaii statutes.
§601-1 Judiciary. There shall be a
branch of government, styled the judiciary. [L 1892, c 57, §1; RL 1925, §2211;
RL 1935, §3570; RL 1945, §9571; RL 1955, §213-1; am L 1959, c 259, §1(a); HRS
§601-1; am L 1974, c 159, §14]

Cross References

Judicial power vested in supreme court and circuit courts,
and in inferior courts established by legislature, see Const. Art. VI, §1.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next